Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB61.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 39A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Emergency Volunteer Corps (KEV Corps) is established under the
authority of the adjutant general and shall be composed of volunteers in each
county, acting locally under the direction of the local emergency management
director and in accordance with the provisions of this section.
(2) The KEV Corps shall:
(a) Be an unarmed volunteer unit organized under the Division of Emergency
Management;
(b) Be under the direction of the adjutant general; and
(c) Act locally under the local emergency management director;
to provide trained volunteer support during emergency situations in accordance
with subsection (9) of this section.
(3) (a) The KEV Corps shall consist of able-bodied citizens who:
1. Are residents of Kentucky between the ages of eighteen (18) and sixty-
four (64);
2. Are not current members of the Armed Forces of the United States,
National Guard, or Reserve components thereof;
3. Have a high school diploma or High School Equivalency Diploma;
4. Submit to and pass a state and national criminal history background
check;
5. Complete KEV Corps basic training or show documentation of
military service within the past five (5) years; and
6. Maintain certifications or other training standards required by the
adjutant general.
Page 1 of 12
XXXX 11/3/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 13
(b) Persons who do not meet the standards described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection may participate in an auxiliary role as prescribed by the local
emergency management director.
(4) Each KEV Corps volunteer shall attend and complete basic training provided at
the direction of the adjutant general and have continued training no less than
one (1) day a month and one (1) week each calendar year.
(5) Training standards for KEV Corps shall include:
(a) The United States and Kentucky Constitutions, civics, and common law
training;
(b) Successful completion of the United States citizenship test;
(c) First aid, CPR, and AED safety training;
(d) Training and certification by the Federal Emergency Management
Agency's Community Emergency Response Team training program or
equivalent volunteer emergency management training as directed by the
adjutant general;
(e) Emergency communications, radio, and linking to amateur or ham radio
communities;
(f) Physical training and self-defense;
(g) Field and survival skills; and
(h) Advanced training for leaders and job-specific skills as identified by the
adjutant general.
(6) The uniform of KEV Corps volunteers shall include:
(a) Khaki colored pants;
(b) KEV Corps logoed tee shirt;
(c) Reflective safety vest;
(d) Sturdy footwear or boots; and
(e) Any other insignia, clothing, or protective gear as determined by the
Page 2 of 12
XXXX 11/3/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 13
adjutant general.
(7) The KEV Corps shall rely upon state appropriations, donations, and any
available grants or moneys.
(8) The Department of Military Affairs may develop a command structure to
coordinate any regional or statewide emergency use with the consent of the local
KEV Corps units or members.
(9) The KEV Corps may be used in response to severe weather, earthquakes,
declared emergencies, and at the discretion of the adjutant general or the local
emergency management director.
(10) The KEV Corps may cooperate with state and local emergency management
agencies, local governments, law enforcement, first responders, volunteer
organizations, and state community crisis teams.
(11) Members of the KEV Corps shall not perform the military duties of Kentucky
National Guard members or those of peace officers and shall not have the power
of arrest, the ability to issue citations, or the authority to use or carry deadly
weapons in the scope of their duties.
(12) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency
account to be known as the Kentucky Emergency Volunteer Corps fund.
The fund shall consist of moneys received from state appropriations, gifts,
grants, donations, and federal funds.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Department of Military Affairs.
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for buying uniforms, training
expenses, emergency preparedness supplies and equipment, first aid
supplies, promotional material, and the effectuation of this section and for
no other purpose.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal
Page 3 of 12
XXXX 11/3/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 13
year.
Section 2. KRS 39B.030 is amended to read as follows:
A local emergency management director, appointed pursuant to this chapter, shall have
the following powers, authorities, rights, and duties:
(1) To represent the county judge/executive, or chief executive officers in the case of
counties acting jointly under KRS 39B.010, or mayor on all matters pertaining to
the comprehensive emergency management program and the disaster and
emergency response of the county, counties acting jointly under KRS 39B.010,
urban-county, charter county, or the county or counties acting jointly and the cities
therein, unless there is a local director appointed for a city in accordance with this
chapter, who represents that city;
(2) To be the executive head and chief administrative officer of the local emergency
management agency, and to direct, control, supervise, and manage, the
development, preparation, organization, administration, operation, implementation,
and maintenance of the comprehensive emergency management program of the
county, counties acting jointly under KRS 39B.010, urban-county government,
charter county government, or the county or counties acting jointly and the cities
therein, and to coordinate all local disaster and emergency response, unless there is
a local director appointed for a city in accordance with this chapter, who represents
that city;
(3) To develop and maintain a local emergency operations plan entitled "county
emergency operations plan," or "joint counties emergency operations plan," or "city
emergency operations plan," or "city/county emergency operations plan," as
appropriate, the provisions of which shall establish the organizational structure to
be utilized by local government to manage disaster and emergency response, and
set forth the policies, procedures, and guidelines for the coordination of all disaster
and emergency response in the county and all the cities therein for an emergency,
Page 4 of 12
XXXX 11/3/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 13
declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophe. The local emergency operations plan
shall be developed consistent with the appropriate provisions of the Kentucky
emergency operations plan, the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, planning
guidance issued by the division, and administrative regulations promulgated by the
division. The local emergency operations plan shall be officially adopted by signed
executive order of the county judge/executive or mayor, or in the case of counties
acting jointly under KRS 39B.010, by all chief executive officers of the
participating counties. The executive order shall be filed with the office of the clerk
for the local jurisdiction and a copy placed in the local emergency operations plan.
A copy of the local emergency operations plan, and all revisions or updates thereto,
shall be submitted by the local director to the Division of Emergency Management
for concurrence review and reference. The local emergency operations plan shall be
a component of the integrated emergency management system of the
Commonwealth, and subject to the Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan, shall be
the primary local strategic planning document governing the coordination of all
disaster and emergency response in the county, counties acting jointly under KRS
39B.010, city, or the county or counties acting jointly and the cities therein, and
shall be applicable to, utilized by, and adhered to by, all local emergency response
departments, agencies, and officials of the local disaster and emergency services
organization in the county and the cities therein. The local emergency operations
plan shall be updated not less than annually;
(4) To establish and maintain a local disaster and emergency services organization in
accordance with the local emergency operations plan, the Kentucky Emergency
Operations Plan, and the provisions of KRS 39B.050;
(5) To notify the county judge/executive, mayor, or executive authority of other local
governments and the Division of Emergency Management immediately of the
occurrence, or threatened or impending occurrence, of any emergency or disaster,
Page 5 of 12
XXXX 11/3/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 13
and recommend any emergency actions which should be executed;
(6) To be the chief advisor to, and the primary on-scene representative of, the county
judge/executive, mayor, or executive authority of other local governments in the
event of occurrence of any emergency, declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophe
within the local jurisdiction;
(7) (a) To respond and have full access to the scenes of an emergency, declared
emergency, disaster, or catastrophe to immediately investigate, analyze, or
assess the seriousness of all situations; to coordinate the establishment and
operation of a local incident command or management system; to execute the
local emergency operations plan, as appropriate; to activate the local
emergency operations center or on-scene command post; to convene
meetings, gather information, conduct briefings, and to notify the division of
on-going response actions; and fully expedite and coordinate the disaster and
emergency response of all local public and private agencies, or to have a staff
assistant do so.[;]
(b) At a declared emergency or declared disaster, at the direction of the county
judge/executive or mayor, as appropriate, to take or direct immediate actions
to protect public safety; however, this paragraph shall not preclude a local
director from providing any assistance that he or she is requested to, and is
able to, provide at any emergency;[.]
(8) To act as an official representative of the division in emergency situations when
specifically requested by the director;
(9) To report directly to the county judge/executive, mayor, or executive authority of
other local governments, act in an official policy-making capacity when carrying
out the duties of local emergency management director, and exercise full signatory
authority for execution of all contracts, agreements, or other official documents
pertaining to the administration and operation of the local emergency management
Page 6 of 12
XXXX 11/3/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 13
agency and program;
(10) To direct or supervise all paid or volunteer emergency management staff assistants
or other local emergency management agency workers, and all operating units or
personnel officially appointed and affiliated with the local disaster and emergency
services organization pursuant to KRS 39B.070 and the Kentucky Emergency
Volunteer Corps within his or her county pursuant to Section 1 of this Act;
(11) To prepare and submit regular or scheduled program activity reports to the area
manager of the division and local chief executives;
(12) To execute bond, if appropriate, in the amount determined by the appointing
authorities;
(13) Annually, by the first day of March, to prepare and submit a program budget
request to the county judge/executive and mayor;
(14) Annually, by the fifteenth day of July, to prepare and submit to the division a
locally-approved, fiscal year program paper and budget request;
(15) To perform all administrative, organizational, or operational tasks required by the
provisions of this chapter, or administrative regulations, or program guidance
pertaining thereto;
(16) To be a registered member of the Kentucky Emergency Management Association
or other professional emergency management organization; and
(17) To carry out all other emergency management-related duties as required by KRS
Chapters 39A to 39F, administrative regulations, or local orders or ordinances.
Section 3. KRS 39B.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each local emergency management director shall establish and maintain a local
disaster and emergency services organization in accordance with a city or county or
city/county or joint counties emergency operations plan required pursuant to KRS
Chapters 39A to 39F. The local disaster and emergency services organization shall
be composed[comprised] of the following members and participants:
Page 7 of 12
XXXX 11/3/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 13
(a) The county judge/executive, or chief executive officers when counties are
acting jointly under KRS 39B.010, and mayors, or the chief executive of other
local governments;
(b) Elected legislative officials of the county and cities;
(c) The local emergency management director and all local emergency
management agency staff members and workers, or emergency management
agency-supervised operating units or personnel;
(d) All regular or volunteer public safety or emergency services department heads
or agency chiefs in the cities or county;
(e) All regular or volunteer public safety or emergency services department or
agency members in the cities or county, including Kentucky Emergency
Volunteer Corps members as established in Section 1 of this Act;
(f) All districts, corporations, public agencies, groups, or political subdivisions of
the state and special districts within the county or the cities thereof, which are
organized under the laws of the Commonwealth to provide an emergency
response service or related function in the interest of public safety; and
(g) All private sector personnel, agencies, organizations, companies, businesses,
or individuals and citizens who agree to provide their assets, resources,
talents, services, or supplies in aid to the local disaster and emergency
services organization of the cities or county in accordance with the approved
local emergency operations plan of the city, county, or counties acting jointly
under KRS 39B.010, urban-county government, or charter county
government.
(2) The local disaster and emergency services organization shall have responsibility for
the performance of all disaster and emergency response functions contemplated in
KRS 39A.010, 39A.020, or 39A.030 and as listed or assigned in the city, county, or
counties acting jointly under KRS 39B.010, or city/county emergency operations
Page 8 of 12
XXXX 11/3/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 13
plan, except that the Division of Forestry of the Energy and Environment Cabinet
shall have primary responsibility for directing the implementation of all forest fire
emergency responses consistent with KRS Chapter 149. Disaster and emergency
response functions may be assigned within the local disaster and emergency
services organization to existing agencies and organizations, public and private. It
shall not be necessary for the local disaster and emergency services organization to
create, provide, or maintain an additional or auxiliary capability for any existing
function or service deemed adequate to local needs.
(3) The local disaster and emergency services organization shall be the primary disaster
and emergency response force of city, county, or counties acting jointly under KRS
39B.010, urban-county government, or charter county government and an
organizational component of the integrated emergency management system of the
Commonwealth. The local emergency management director shall have primary
responsibility for the coordination of all disaster and emergency response of the
local disaster and emergency services organization for an emergency, declared
emergency, disaster, or catastrophe.
Section 4. KRS 39B.070 is amended to read as follows:
Each city, county, urban-county government, or charter county government may:
(1) Through the county judge/executive of a county other than an urban-county
government, mayor of an urban-county government, chief executive of other local
governments, or mayor of a city, or their designees as provided by ordinance,
declare in writing a state of emergency when required, and thereafter execute any
emergency powers granted under this chapter to provide for adequate and
appropriate response to any occurrence or situation or any impending event or
situation resulting from any of the situations or events contemplated by KRS
39A.010, 39A.020, or 39A.030;
(2) Appropriate and expend funds, make contracts, enact cost-recovery ordinances,
Page 9 of 12
XXXX 11/3/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 13
obtain and distribute equipment, materials, and supplies for disaster and emergency
response purposes; provide for the health and safety of persons and property,
including emergency assistance to the victims of any disaster or emergency; review
or approve local emergency operations plans; and enact orders or ordinances
pertaining to local emergency management programs in accordance with the
policies and plans prescribed by the federal and state emergency management
agencies and the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;
(3) Appoint, employ, remove, or provide, with or without compensation, staff assistants
to the local emergency management director, and clerical, administrative, technical
or other local emergency management agency staff personnel, and local emergency
management agency-supervised operating units officially affiliated with the local
disaster and emergency services organization by city or county order or ordinance
including rescue squads, auxiliary fire, police, and medical personnel, urban search
and rescue teams, severe weather spotters teams, damage assessment teams,
amateur radio or communications personnel, Kentucky Emergency Volunteer
Corps members, or other emergency response groups, teams, or personnel, and
other disaster and emergency response workers;
(4) Establish a primary and one (1) or more secondary emergency operations centers or
on-scene command posts to serve as official local government command posts
during an emergency, declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophe;
(5) Subject to the order of the Governor, or the chief executive of the county, urban-
county government, charter county government, or city, to assign and make
available for duty, the employees, property, or equipment of the county or city
relating to firefighting, engineering, rescue, health, medical and related services,
police, transportation, construction, and similar items or services for disaster and
emergency response purposes within or outside of the physical limits of the county,
urban-county government, charter county government, or city;
Page 10 of 12
XXXX 11/3/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 13
(6) In the event of a national emergency or state of declared emergency or declared
disaster or catastrophe, as provided in KRS 39A.100, waive procedures and
formalities otherwise required by the law pertaining to: the performance of public
work; entering into contracts; the incurring of obligations; the employment of
permanent and temporary workers; the utilization of volunteer workers; the rental
of equipment; the purchase and distribution, with or without compensation, of
supplies, materials, and facilities; the appropriation and expenditure of public funds;
and the demolition and removal of damaged public and private structures; and
(7) Confer or authorize the conferring upon members of the auxiliary police the powers
of peace officers, subject to the provisions of KRS 61.300, and any other
restrictions imposed by the appointing authority.
Section 5. KRS 39C.110 is amended to read as follows:
Local emergency management agencies, including local directors or their deputies, and
other local emergency management agency staff personnel and workers, and local
emergency management agency-supervised operating units or personnel officially
affiliated with the local disaster and emergency services organizations, including the
Kentucky Emergency Volunteer Corps, pursuant to KRS 39B.070, paid or volunteer, for
the purposes of receiving workers' compensation benefits paid by the division, shall be
covered by those benefits when performing emergency assessment, mitigation,
preparedness, response, or recovery functions, with the following limitations:
(1) The local emergency management agencies, including local directors or staff
personnel and workers, and local emergency management agency-supervised
operating units or personnel, including the Kentucky Emergency Volunteer Corps,
shall not be covered when performing fundraising functions, unless all proceeds of
the function are to be dedicated to the administration or operation of the local
emergency management agency or operating unit.
(2) No person shall be covered when performing hazardous materials emergency
Page 11 of 12
XXXX 11/3/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 13
response operations defined in 29 C.F.R. 1910.120 which are above the first-
responder operations level, on-scene incident commander level excluded, except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) A volunteer hazardous materials response team as defined in 29 C.F.R. 1910.120
which meets all provisions of 29 C.F.R. 1910.120(q), operates on a regional basis,
and is supervised by a local emergency management agency may, by action of the
director pursuant to administrative regulations, be provided Kentucky emergency
management workers' compensation coverage. Such hazardous materials response
teams shall take no actions involving environmental clean-up, removal, or
transportation of hazardous substances or materials except as may be essential for
initial emergency control or initial emergency stabilization when there is a clear and
evident risk of harm to people.
(4) No person shall be covered unless enrolled on a workers' compensation enrollment
form that is filed with the area manager of the division, except when the magnitude
of an emergency, or a preparedness exercise activity, is so great that a local director
must solicit additional workers. At these times, the local director may develop and
maintain a list of workers, to include names, Social Security account numbers,
missions assigned, and dates covered, and submit a copy of the list to the area
manager within twenty-four (24) hours of the conclusion of the emergency, or the
preparedness exercise activity.
Page 12 of 12
XXXX 11/3/2025 1:40 PM Jacketed